Vermont statutes. Title 20 Internal Security and Public Safety
Subchapter 2. State Police

§ 1911.
Examinations; appointment; promotion; probation.

The Commissioner shall devise and administer examinations designed to test the qualifications of applicants for positions as State Police and only those applicants shall be appointed or promoted who meet the prescribed standards and qualifications. All State Police shall be on probation for one year from the date of first appointment. Such examinations shall be with the advice of the Department of Human Resources.

HISTORY:

Amended

1979, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 15.

§ 1912.
Bond and oath.

State Police shall give bond to the State, at the expense of the State, in such penal sum as the Commissioner shall require, conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties.
State Police and auxiliary State Police shall take the oath of office prescribed for sheriffs before the Commissioner or any person designated under

12 V.S.A. § 5852

to administer oaths.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 101

.

§ 1913.
Uniforms and equipment.

Within the appropriation for the Department, the Commissioner shall provide the State Police, and such other members as he or she may designate, with uniforms and all members with the equipment necessary in the performance of their respective duties, which shall remain the property of the State. The Commissioner may sell such equipment as may become unfit for use, and all monies received from the sale shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Department’s appropriation. The Commissioner shall keep an inventory and shall charge against each member all property of the Department issued to him or her, and if the Commissioner shall determine that a loss or destruction was due to the carelessness or neglect of the member, the value of the property shall be deducted from his or her pay.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 157.

§ 1914.
Powers and immunities.

The Commissioner of Public Safety and the State Police shall be peace officers and shall have the same powers with respect to criminal matters and the enforcement of the law relating to criminal matters as sheriffs, constables, and local police have in their respective jurisdictions, and shall have all the immunities and matters of defense now available or hereafter made available to sheriffs, constables, and local police in a suit brought against them in consequence of acts done in the course of their employment. State Police shall be informing or complaining officers with the same powers possessed by sheriffs, deputy sheriffs, constables, or police officers of a city or incorporated village as provided in

13 V.S.A. § 5507

.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 39

;

2021, No. 20

, § 158.

§ 1915.
Cooperation with fish and wildlife and forest services.

State Police shall cooperate with game wardens in enforcing the fish and wildlife laws of the State and the laws enacted for the protection and conservation of forests, woodland, and other natural resources, and to this end all the powers now or hereafter conferred on game wardens shall be had and exercised by State Police.